New Jersey, session 222, A2265.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Each school district shall incorporate instruction on water safety into the health education curriculum for students in grades K through 12 as part of the districts implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards for Comprehensive Health and Physical Education. b.    The instruction shall provide students with information on: (1) the nature and danger of rip tides; (2) the importance of learning about water conditions and beach safety practices, particularly for student populations that do not reside near beach communities; (3) hand signs that may be used to indicate swimmer distress; and (4) the sightline limitations of lifeguards and others monitoring swimmers from the beach. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year next following the date of enactment.